Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2111
Certified social worker, defined.

Certified social worker means a person who meets the standards established in subsection (2) of section 38-2128 and who holds a current certificate issued by the department.

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-1,252;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 23;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,304;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 730.